Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-305
Board of trustees; meetings.

The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall hold regular meetings and such special meetings as may be found necessary.

Laws 1881, c. 78, sub. XIII, § 6, p. 374;

R.S.1913, § 7062;

C.S.1922, § 6697;

C.S.1929, § 85-306;

R.S.1943, § 85-305;

Laws 2022, LB887, § 5.